Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-110
Usurious contracts; limit of recovery.

All such contracts are hereby declared contrary to public policy and usurious, and in any action therefor the plaintiff shall recover only the same number of dollars in any lawful money of the United States as the number of dollars contracted for at the time the original contract was entered into, plus interest not exceeding the maximum legal contract rate and costs, and no more.

Laws 1935, c. 126, § 2, p. 452;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 45-129;

R.S.1943, § 45-110.